Louisiana, session 2026, HB133.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:34.3(A), (B)(introductory paragraph), and (C) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 14:34.3(B)(4) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§34.3. Battery of a school teacher
A. Battery of a school teacher is a battery committed without the consent of
the victim when the offender has reasonable grounds to believe the victim is a school
teacher acting in the performance of employment duties or when the battery was
committed because of the status of the victim as a school teacher.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
* * *
(4) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
28:451.2.
C. Whoever commits the crime of battery of a school teacher shall be
punished as follows:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 133 ENROLLED
(1)(a) If the battery was committed by a offender is a student, upon
conviction and the battery does not cause serious bodily injury, the offender he shall
be fined not more than five one thousand dollars or imprisoned for not less than
thirty days nor more than one year six months. At least seventy-two hours of the
sentence imposed shall be imposed served without benefit of suspension of sentence.
(b) If the offender is a student and the battery causes serious bodily injury,
he shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars or imprisoned with or without
hard labor for not less than thirty days nor more than one year. At least seventy-two
hours of the sentence imposed shall be served without benefit of suspension of
sentence.
(2) If the battery was committed by someone who offender is not a student,
regardless if the battery causes serious bodily injury, the offender he shall be fined
not more than five thousand dollars or imprisoned with or without hard labor for not
less than one year nor more than five years, or both. At least six months of the
sentence imposed shall be served without benefit of parole, probation, or suspension
of sentence.
(3) If the battery produces an injury that requires medical attention, the
offender shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars or imprisoned with or
without hard labor for not less than one year nor more than five years, or both.
Section 2. Children's Code Article 897.1(D) through (G) are hereby amended and
reenacted and Children's Code Article 897.1(H) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 897.1. Disposition after adjudication of certain felony-grade delinquent acts
* * *
D.(1) After adjudication of a felony-grade delinquent act based upon R.S.
14:34.3, battery of a school teacher, the court shall commit the child to the custody
of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, or to the custody of a secure
public or private institution, to be confined in secure placement for not less than six
months without benefit of probation or suspension of imposition or execution of
sentence.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 133 ENROLLED
(2) In addition to the penalties provided in Subparagraph (1) of this
Paragraph, the court shall impose a requirement that the child participate in a
court-approved counseling program which may include anger management, abusive
behavior intervention groups, or any other type of counseling deemed appropriate by
the court. Any costs associated with the counseling program shall be borne by the
child or a parent, tutor, guardian, or other person who is financially responsible for
the care of the child.
D. E. Juveniles confined in secure placement for an adjudication as set forth
in Paragraph C of this Article shall be eligible for modification after serving
twenty-four months of the disposition or if the disposition is less than thirty-six
months, one-half of the disposition.
E. F. A motion for modification of a disposition shall be filed pursuant to
Article 910 et seq. and a contradictory hearing shall be set no sooner than thirty days
from the date of notice to the district attorney. To grant a motion for modification
of disposition, the court must find that the child poses a reduced risk to the
community based on the following considerations:
(1) The child has a favorable progress report from the placement facility.
(2) The child meets one of the following work or self-improvement criteria:
(a) Has attained a high school diploma or equivalent.
(b) Is actively participating in workforce training or a certification program
and is in good standing as evidenced by grades and behavior notes submitted by the
child's instructors.
(3) The child has obtained a low-risk designation as determined by a valid
risk assessment procedure approved by the office of juvenile justice.
(4) The recommendation of the office of juvenile justice.
(5) A reentry plan that includes an appropriate placement to conduct
supervision and achieve aftercare goals.
(6) Any additional evidence provided by the child, the state, or the office of
juvenile justice.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 133 ENROLLED
F. G. At least six months prior to the release of the child, the department
shall prepare an individualized and thorough transitional plan that identifies the
techniques, programs, personnel, and facilities that will be used to assist the child in
achieving a successful return to his family and the community. A copy of the
transitional plan shall be mailed to the court that ordered the disposition of
commitment.
G. H. The provisions of this Article shall apply to all children in the custody
of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of juvenile justice, on or
after August 1, 2018.
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
renumber the Paragraphs of R.S. 14:34.3(B) so as to properly place R.S. 14:34.3(B)(4) as
enacted by this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.